Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 20252-1223
Licensees; exempt from Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.

Those corporations or associations eligible for licenses to conduct horseracing meets by the parimutuel method as defined in section 2-1204, shall be exempt from the Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act.

Laws 1980, LB 939, § 7;

Laws 2025, LB357, § 9.

Uniform Disposition of Unclaimed Property Act, see section 69-1329.